Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB859.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 454.185 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The surety in every bond provided for by any statute derived from the former Civil
Code[,] or by the Rules of Civil Procedure shall:[must ]
(a) Be a resident of this state;[, and ]
(b) Be worth double the sum to be secured beyond the amount of the surety's[his]
debts;[,] and
(c) Have property liable to execution in this state equal to the sum to be secured.
(2) If there are[be] two (2) or more sureties in the same bond, they shall[must], in the
aggregate, have the qualifications prescribed in this section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:06 PM Jacketed